Arkansas, session 2025, HB1568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-12-318(a)(3)(B), concerning postmortem
examinations, is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) The county coroner having jurisdiction where a
death occurs shall submit a decedent to the State Crime Laboratory for a
postmortem examination when the death is by apparent drug, alcohol, or poison
toxicity, unless a significant interval passed while the person was
hospitalized and hospital evaluation is available for review.
(ii) As used in subdivision (a)(3)(B)(i) of this
section, "hospitalized" means admitted to a hospital for inpatient treatment.

/s/Childress
*CEB145*
02-27-2025 10:40:43 CEB145